Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1905
Examinee, defined.

Examinee shall mean the individual who is being examined, tested, or questioned by an examiner or intern for the purpose of verifying truthfulness or detecting deception.

Laws 1980, LB 485, § 5.